West Virginia, session 2026, HB5668.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. CENTRAL WEST VIRGINIA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND RURAL REVITALIZATION ACT. §5B-12-1. Short title.This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Central West Virginia Economic Development and Rural Revitalization Act." §5B-12-2. Legislative findings and purpose.(a) The Legislature finds that certain counties in central West Virginia experience persistent economic distress, including limited employment opportunities, declining population, aging infrastructure, and reduced access to capital.(b) The Legislature further finds that targeted, regionally focused economic development strategies are necessary to promote job creation, entrepreneurship, infrastructure investment, tourism, and long-term economic sustainability while preserving the rural character of these communities.(c) The purpose of this article is to establish a coordinated economic and rural revitalization program to:(1) Encourage private investment and job creation;(2) Support small businesses and entrepreneurship;(3) Expand workforce development opportunities;(4) Improve infrastructure and broadband access;(5) Strengthen downtowns and rural communities; and (6) Strengthen and expand tourism by investing in outdoor recreation, heritage, and community-based destinations. §5B-12-3. Definitions.As used in this article:(1) "Central West Virginia region" means the counties of Webster, Clay, Braxton, Roane, Calhoun, Wirt, Lewis, and Gilmer.(2) "Department" means the West Virginia Department Commerce(3) "Eligible entity" means a county or municipal government, development authority, nonprofit organization, small business, or public-private partnership operating within the Central West Virginia region.(4) "Program" means the Central West Virginia Economic Development and Rural Revitalization Program established by this article. §5B-12-4. Establishment of program; administration.(a) There is hereby created within the Department the Central West Virginia Economic Development and Rural Revitalization Program.(b) The Department shall administer the program and may coordinate with WorkForce West Virginia, the Division of Highways, the West Virginia Development Office, and other state agencies as necessary. §5B-12-5. Authorized program activities.(a) The Department may provide grants, loans, and technical assistance for projects located in the Central West Virginia region, including but not limited to:(1) Business development, expansion, and site preparation;(2) Small business and entrepreneurial support;(3) Workforce training and skills development;(4) Infrastructure, water, sewer, transportation, and broadband projects;(5) Downtown redevelopment, housing rehabilitation, new housing, community facilities, and renovation of viable buildings throughout the region that could expand, attract, and support businesses; and(6) Tourism, agriculture, and value-added manufacturing initiatives. §5B-12-6. Eligibility and priority.(a) Only projects located within the Central West Virginia region are eligible for assistance pursuant to this article.(b) In awarding assistance, the Department shall give priority to projects that:(1) Create or retain jobs;(2) Leverage private or federal funding;(3) Demonstrate regional collaboration;(4) Promote long-term economic sustainability(5) Benefit economically distressed or underserved communities; and(6) Promote Tourism. §5B-12-7. Central West Virginia investment tax credit.(a) There is hereby created a Central West Virginia Investment Tax Credit against the personal income tax and corporation net income tax.(b) A taxpayer is eligible for the credit if the taxpayer:(1) Makes a qualified capital investment in a business or facility located in the Central West Virginia region; and(2) Creates or retains full-time jobs within the region.(c) The credit shall equal up to 25 percent of the qualified investment, as determined by the Department in consultation with the State Tax Department.(d) The credit may be applied over a period not to exceed five taxable years. §5B-12-8. Small business job creation tax credit.(a) A small business located within the Central West Virginia region that creates new full-time jobs may receive a tax credit of up to $3,000 per job, per year, for a period not to exceed three years.(b) The Department shall certify eligible businesses and job creation prior to issuance of the credit. §5B-12-9. Rulemaking authority.The Department shall propose legislative rules in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement this article, including rules governing application procedures, eligibility standards, tax credit certification, and reporting requirements. §5B-12-10. Reporting requirements.(a) The Department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Joint Committee on Government and Finance.(b) The report shall include:(1) A list of funded projects;(2) Counties served;(3) Jobs created or retained;(4) Amount of private and public investment leveraged; and(5) Program outcomes and performance metrics. §5B-12-11. Effective date.This article shall take effect July 1, 2026.